Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.020

Publication of notice of intention to sell.

Whenever the county legislative authority desires to dispose of any county property except:

(1) When selling to a governmental agency;

(2) When personal property to be disposed of is to be traded in upon the purchase of a like article;

(3) When the value of the property to be sold is less than two thousand five hundred dollars;

(4) When the county legislative authority by a resolution setting forth the facts has declared an emergency to exist;

it shall publish notice of its intention so to do once each week during two successive weeks in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county.

[ 1991 c 363 s 66; 1985 c 469 s 45; 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.34.020. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-1; prior: 1891 c 76 s 2, part; RRS s 4008, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 144: See note following RCW 36.900.030.